Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PUBLIC EDUCATIONAL RADIO STATIONS.new text end new text begin $2,225,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,225,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for grants to the Association of Minnesota Public Educational Radio Stations for production and acquisition grants according to Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.19. new text end